Oklahoma, session 2026, SB941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9002.1 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Pharmaceutical product” means any drug or device as defined


in Section 353.1 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes including


prescription drugs, over-the-counter medications, vaccines, and


products intended for research purposes;


2. “Ingredient” includes:

Req. No. 1363 Page 1


a. all active and inactive components,


b. biological materials, such as mRNA, DNA from human or


animal sources, and viral vectors,


c. synthetic materials, including lipids, nanotechnology


components, and polymers, and


d. adjuvants, preservatives, stabilizers, and other


additives; and


3. “Manufacturer” means any person or entity engaged in the


production, preparation, propagation, compounding, or processing of


pharmaceutical products, as defined in Section 353.1 of Title 59 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9002.2 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Manufacturers of pharmaceutical products, including those


intended exclusively for research purposes, shall publish a complete


and detailed list of all ingredients for each product.


1. The list shall include:


a. the chemical and common names of all active, inactive,


biological, and synthetic ingredients,


b. the origin of any biological materials, specifying


whether they are derived from human, animal, or


synthetic sources,


c. the purpose of each ingredient, and

Req. No. 1363 Page 2


d. the quantity or concentration of each ingredient,


including trace elements and residuals.


2. For products containing mRNA or other gene-based technology,


the disclosure shall specify:


a. the sequence and source of any nucleic acids, and


b. the delivery mechanism, including synthetic carriers


such as lipid nanoparticles.


B. The ingredient information shall be:


1. Submitted to the State Board of Pharmacy;


2. Published publicly on a manufacturer-maintained website; and


3. Included in product labeling and marketing materials.


C. The responsibility to disclose all ingredients or components


of any pharmaceutical product, medical treatment, or mandate shall


remain unchanged regardless of whether a national emergency is


declared by the President of the United States or Congress. The


rights of individuals shall not be suspended, abridged, or infringed


during any declared emergency.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9002.3 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Noncompliance with the provisions of this act shall result


in the following penalties:


1. Fines up to Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000) per violation,


per product; and

Req. No. 1363 Page 3


2. Suspension or revocation of the right to distribute or sell


the noncompliant pharmaceutical product within this state until


compliance is achieved.


B. Enhanced penalties for repeated or willful violations shall


be assessed as follows:


1. Escalating fines:


a. on a second violation: fines up to One Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) per product, and


b. on a third or subsequent violation: fines up to Two


Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) per


product;


2. Prohibition of operations: For continued noncompliance, the


manufacturer may be prohibited from distributing or selling any


pharmaceutical products in this state for up to one (1) year; and


3. Criminal liability: Repeated or intentional


misrepresentation or omission of ingredient information is a


misdemeanor crime punishable by up to one (1) year imprisonment.


C. The following civil remedies shall be available:


1. Private right to civil action: Any individual or group


harmed by noncompliance with this act, including misrepresentation


or omission of ingredient information, may bring a civil lawsuit


against the manufacturer for damages including, but not limited to:


a. economic damages including, but not limited to,


medical expenses or financial losses,

Req. No. 1363 Page 4


b. noneconomic damages including, but not limited to,


pain and suffering or emotional distress, and


c. punitive damages, as appropriate under Oklahoma law.


2. Class action suit: Affected individuals may form a class to


seek collective remedy in cases of widespread harm resulting from


noncompliance.


D. The State of Oklahoma may seek injunctive relief to compel


compliance or halt the distribution and sale of noncompliant


pharmaceutical products.


E. Individuals who report violations of this act by


manufacturers shall be protected from retaliation under applicable


whistleblower statutes and may be entitled to a percentage of fines


collected as a result of their report.


F. The State Board of Pharmacy shall establish a reporting


system for individuals to file complaints regarding suspected


violations of this act, with such reports forwarded to the


Legislature for review and potential enforcement action.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9002.4 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Legislature shall retain exclusive rule-making authority to


implement and enforce the provisions of this act.





Req. No. 1363 Page 5


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9002.5 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


To the extent any laws conflict with this act, this act shall


govern.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.




60-1-1363 DC 1/19/2025 5:46:25 AM

































Req. No. 1363 Page 6